Hawaii, session 2026, HB1751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 121-45, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The adjutant general, subject to the availability of funds, may award tuition assistance to qualified enlisted persons, warrant officers, and company grade officers (0-1 through 0-3) in the Hawaii national guard who are: (1)  Residents of the State, as defined by the board of regents pursuant to section [[]304A-402[]]; and (2)  Undergraduate and graduate students working toward a degree on any campus of the [University] university of Hawaii." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________